src/verb-fao-morph.txt
! =============== !
! Verb morphology !
! =============== !


LEXICON s1  ! nevna
standard-ir ;  ! Verbal forms
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l7 ;      ! Adjectival forms

LEXICON s2  ! keypa
standard-ir-t ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>t l39 ;

LEXICON s3  ! leiða
standard-ir ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l18 ;

LEXICON s4  ! frøa
inf ;
pres-ir ;
prt-dd ;
imp-prsptc ;
sup-tt ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s5  ! senda
standard-ir ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s6  ! hirða
standard-ir ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s7  ! rista
standard-ir ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s8  ! kenna
standard-ir ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s9  ! klippa
inf ;
pres-ir ;
prt-t ;
imp-prsptc ;
sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>t l5 ;

LEXICON s10 ! fylgja
standard-j-ir ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s11 ! roykja
standard-j-ir ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s12 ! boyggja
standard-j-ir ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s13 ! søkkja
standard-j-ir ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s14 ! heingja
jinf ;
pres-ir ;
:%^EIO prt-d ;
:%^EIO imp-prsptc ;
:%^EIO sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s15 ! skeinkja
jinf ;
pres-ir ;
:%^EIO prt-d ;
:%^EIO imp-prsptc ;
:%^EIO sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s16 ! flekja
jinf ;
pres-ir ;
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsptc ;
:%^WVV sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s17 ! berja
jinf ;
pres-ir ;
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsptc ;
:%^WVV sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s18 ! krevja
jinf ;
pres-ur ;
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsptc ;
:%^WVV sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s19 ! dylja
jinf ;
pres-ur ;
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsptc ;
:%^WVV sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s20 ! leggja
:egg   jinf ;
:egg   pres-ur ;
:eg    prt-ði ; 
:øg    prt-du ;
:ag    imp-prsptc ;
:ag    sup ;
:ag%>d l8 ;

LEXICON s21 ! selja
jinf ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s22 ! ryðja
jinf ;
pres-ur ;
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsptc ;
:%^WVV sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l18 ;

LEXICON s23 ! smyrja
:yr jinf ;
:yr pres-null ;
:ur prt-d ;
:yr imp-prsptc ;
:yr sup ;
:ur%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s24 ! flysa
inf ;
pres-ur ; ! XXX not pres-null
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsptc ;
:%^WVV sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s25 ! liva
inf ;
pres-ir ;
prt-d ;
imp-prsptc ;
sup-a ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l6 ;

LEXICON s26 ! plaga
inf ;
pres-ar ;
prt-d ;
imp-prsptc ;
sup-a ;

LEXICON s27 ! spáa
inf ;
pres-ar ;
prt-dd ;
imp-prsptc ;
sup-tt ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l18 ;

LEXICON s28 ! skaða
inf ;
pres-ar ;
prt-d ;
imp-prsptc ;
sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>d l18 ;

LEXICON s29 ! brúka
inf ;
pres-ar ;
prt-d ;
imp-prsptc ;
sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>t l5 ;

LEXICON s30 ! kalla
inf ;
pres-ar ;
prt-a ;
:a impsg ; !deviant kalla
imppl ;
prsptc ;
sup-a ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>að l6 ;

LEXICON s31 ! only the verb gera and Xgera
:er inf ;
:er pres-null ;
:er imp-prsptc ;
:jør prt-d ;
:jør sup ;
+V+PrfPrc:jørd%> l7 ;

LEXICON s32 ! búgva
:gv      inf ;
:gv      pres-strong-s1 ;
:r%^IUML pres-strong-s23 ;
:gv      pres-pl ; 
:gv      imp-prsptc ; 
         prt-a ;
+V+PrfPrc:gvin  l32 ;

LEXICON s33 ! rógva
:gv      inf ;
:gv      pres-strong-s1 ;
:r%^IUML pres-strong-s23 ;
:gv      pres-pl ; 
:gv      imp-prsptc ; 
         prt-a ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>gvin  l32 ;


LEXICON s34 ! goyggja
:ggj    inf ;
:r       pres-strong-s1 ;
:r       pres-strong-s23 ;
         pres-pl ; 
:ggj     imp-prsptc ; 
         prt-a ;
         sup-a ;



! Strong verbs starting here
! ==========================

LEXICON s35 ! bíta
                    inf ;
                    pres-ur ;
:%^AB1              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB2              prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^VSH              sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^VSHin   l26 ;

LEXICON s36 ! svíkja
:j                  inf ;
                    pres-ur ;
:%^AB1              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB2              prt-u-p ;
:j                  imp-prsptc ;
:%^VSH              sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^VSHin   l26 ;


LEXICON s37 ! bróta
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^AB7              pres-strong-s23 ;
:%^AB1              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB4              prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB5              sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^VSHin   l26 ;


LEXICON s38 ! skjóta present tense
:jót                inf ;
:ýt                 pres-strong-s1 ;
:ýt                 pres-strong-s23 ;
:ýt                 imp-prsptc ; !XXX
:ut                 prt-u-p ;
:ot                 sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:otin      l26 ;

LEXICON s39/30
:jóð s30 ; ! weak infl + common forms
     s39 ; ! umlauted forms, XXX check.
     
LEXICON s39 ! bjóða umlaut forms
:ýð                 pres-strong-s1 ;
:ýð                 pres-strong-s23 ;
:eyð                prt-null-s ; ! Gunnar
:úði                prt-null-s ; ! 1Mos
:úð                 prt-u-p ;
:óð                 sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:óðin      l26 ;

LEXICON s40 ! fúka
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^IUML             pres-strong-s23 ;
!:%^IUML            pres-ur ;
:%^AB1              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB4              prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB5              sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB5in   l26 ;

LEXICON s41 ! flúgva
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^IUML%^VDEL       pres-strong-s23 ; !flýgv, should be flýg
:%^AB1%^VDEL        prt-null-s ;
:%^VSH%^VDEL        prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB5%^VDEL        sup-null ; 
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB5%^VDELin   l26 ; 

LEXICON s42 ! klúgva
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^IUML              pres-strong-s23 ; ! klýgv, should be klýv
!:%^IUML            pres-ur ;
:%^AB1              prt-null-s ; !kleygv, should be kleyv
:%^VSH              prt-u-p ; !klugv, should be kluv
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB5              sup-null ; !klogv, should be klov
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB5in   l26 ; !klogvin, should be klovin

LEXICON s43 ! njóta
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^IUML            pres-strong-s23 ; !njót, should be nýt
!                   pres-ur ;
:%^AB1              prt-null-s ; !njeyt, should be neyt
:%^AB4              prt-u-p ; !njut, should be nut
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB5              sup-null ; !njot, should be not
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB5in   l26 ; !njotin, should be notin

LEXICON s44 ! finna
                    inf ;
                    pres-ur ;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB4              prt-du ; !funndu, should be fundu
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB4              sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB4in   l26 ;

LEXICON s45 ! binda
                    inf ;
                    pres-ur ;
:%^aAB              prt-null-s ; !band, should be bant
:%^AB4              prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB4              sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB4in   l26 ;

LEXICON s46 ! stinga
                    inf ;
                    pres-ur ;
:%^NGKK%^aAB        prt-null-s ; !stikk, should be stakk
:%^AB4              prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB4              sup-null   ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB4in   l26 ;

LEXICON s47 ! svimja
:imj                inf ;
:im                 pres-ur-j ;
:am                 prt-null-s ;
:um                 prt-u-p ;
:im                 imp-prsptc ;
:om                 sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:om%>in    l26 ;

!LEXICON s47 ! svimja
!                   inf ;
!                   pres-ur ;
!:%^aAB             prt-null-s ;
!:%^AB4             prt-u-p ;
!                   imp-prsptc ;
!:%^oAB             sup-null ;
!+V+PrfPrc:%^oABin  l26 ;

LEXICON s48 ! drekka
                    inf ;
                    pres-ur ;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB4              prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB4              sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>in      l26 ;

LEXICON s49 ! detta
                    inf ;
                    pres-ur ;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB4  	        prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB5              sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB5in   l26 ;

LEXICON s50 ! røkka
                    inf ;
                    pres-ur ;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:                   prt-null-s ;
:%^AB4              prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB5              sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB5in   l26 ;

LEXICON s51 ! ganga
:ang                inf ;
:ang                pres-strong-s1 ;
:ong                pres-strong-s23 ; !2?
:ekk                prt-null-s ;
:ing                prt-u-p ;
:ang                imp-prsptc ;
:ingi               sup-a ;
+V+PrfPrc:ing%>in            l26 ;


LEXICON s52 ! veva
                    inf ;
                    pres-ur ;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB2              prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB5              sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB5in   l26 ;

LEXICON s53 ! leypa
:leyp               inf ;
:loyp   	        pres-strong-s1 ;
:loyp               pres-strong-s23 ;
:leyp               prt-null-s ;
:leyp               imp-prsptc ;
:lup                prt-u-p ;
:lop                sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:lopin     l26 ;

LEXICON s54 ! bera
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
                    pres-strong-s23-t0;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB2              prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB5              sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB5in   l26 ;

LEXICON s55 ! fara
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^IUML             pres-strong-s23-t0 ; !far, should be fer
:%^AB3              prt-null-s2 ;
:%^AB3              prt-u-p ;
                    sup-null ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>in      l26 ;

LEXICON s56 ! geva
                    inf ;
                    pres-ur ;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB2              prt-u-p ;
:%^AB6              sup-null ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB6%>in l26 ;

LEXICON s57 ! sita
                    inf ;
                    pres-ur ;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB2              prt-u-p ;
                    sup-null ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>in      l26 ;

LEXICON s58 ! mala
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^IUML             pres-strong-s23 ;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB3              prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
                    sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>in      l26 ;

LEXICON s59 ! stjala
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^IUML             pres-strong-s23 ;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB3              prt-u-p ;
:%^AB5              sup-null ; ! stjol, should be stol
                    imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB5in   l26 ; ! stjol, should be stol

LEXICON s60 ! taka, aka
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^IUML             pres-strong-s23 ;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB3              prt-u-p ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
:%^AB6              sup-null ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB6in   l26 ;

LEXICON s61 ! halda
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^IUML             pres-strong-s23 ;
:%^IUML             prt-null-s ; ! hald / held%>st, should be helt / helt%>st
:%^AB6              prt-u-p ;
:%^AB6              sup-null ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^AB6in   l26 ;

LEXICON s62 ! sova
:sov                inf ;
:svev     	        pres-strong-s1 ;
:svev               pres-strong-s23 ;
:svav               prt-null-s ;
:svóv               prt-u-p ;
:sovi               sup-a ;
:sov                imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>in      l26 ;

LEXICON s63 ! koma
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^eIUML            pres-strong-s23 ;
                    prt-null-s ;
                    prt-u-p ;
                    sup-null ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>in      l26 ;

LEXICON s64 ! láta
                    inf ;
                    pres-strong-s1 ;
:%^eIUML            pres-strong-s23 ;
:%^AB3              prt-null-s ;
:%^AB2              prt-u-p ;
                    sup-null ;
                    imp-prsptc ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>in      l26 ;
